Hawaii statutes.
[§392-4] Place of performance. (a)
"Employment" includes an individual's entire service, performed
within or both within and without this State if:

(1) The service is localized in this State; or

(2) The service is not localized in any state but
some of the service is performed in this State and[:]

(A) The individual's base of operation, or,
if there is no base of operation, the place from which such service is directed
or controlled, is in this State; or

(B) The individual's base of operation or place
from which the service is directed or controlled is not in any state in which
some part of the service is performed but the individual's residence is in this
State.

(b) The term "employment" also
includes all service performed by an officer or member of the crew of an
American vessel on or in connection with such vessel; provided that the
operating office from which the operations of the vessel operating on navigable
waters within or within and without the United States is ordinarily and
regularly supervised, managed, directed, and controlled is within this State.
[L 1969, c 148, pt of §1]

Revision Note

In subsection (a)(2), (A) and (B) reformatted as
subparagraphs (A) and (B) pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next